Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-627
Security procedure, defined.

Security procedure means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. Security procedure includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 389.